Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3293
District; recreation area; regulate use of fire; violation; penalty.

(1) A district may regulate the use of any type of fire, including the smoking of tobacco in any form, and provide for the size, location, and conditions under which a fire may be established in a recreation area. A district may regulate the possession or use in a recreation area of any type of fireworks not prohibited by law.

(2) Any person who lights any type of fire, uses any fireworks, smokes tobacco in any form, or leaves unattended and unextinguished any fire of any type in any location in a recreation area when not permitted by a district shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 5.